Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2656.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1901-A(5), 1902-A, 1903-A, 1904-A(a), 1905-A(a) introductory paragraph and (6), 1907-A, 1908-A(a), (c) and (e), 1910-A, 1911-A, 1912-A and 1913-A(b)(1.4)(i), (d), (e) and (k.1)(6) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 1901-A. Definitions.--The following words and phrases, as used in this article, shall, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meaning:* * *(5) "Community college plan" shall mean a plan prepared in accordance with the policies, standards, rules and regulations of the State Board of Higher Education for the establishment or operation of a community college and shall include a survey of any industrial development and manpower needs of the area and of any career and technical and occupational shortage and the means by which the community college program and curriculum shall further industrial development, reduce unemployment and improve employable skills of residents of the area to be served by the community college.* * *Section 1902-A. Powers and Duties of State Board of Higher Education.--(a) The State Board of Higher Education shall have the power, and its duty shall be:(1) To adopt such policies, standards, rules and regulations [formulated by the Council of Higher Education,] as may be necessary to provide for the establishment, operation and maintenance of community colleges, including minimum requirements for physical facilities and equipment, curriculum, faculty, standards and professional requirements, qualifications for admission and advancement of students, student enrollment, student population of the area to be served by the community college, requirements for satisfactory completion of a two-year program and the degrees or diplomas or certificates to be awarded therefor, means of financing and financial resources for 20260HB2656PN3667 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the establishment and support of the community college, and all matters necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act.(2) To approve or disapprove plans for the establishment or operation of a community college.(3) To approve or disapprove petitions of school districts or municipalities applying for participation in an established community college. No petition may be approved unless it is accompanied by the consent of the governing bodies of the majority of the members of the local sponsor of the established community college to the participation of the petitioning school district or municipality.(b) In determining such policies, standards, rules and regulations, the State Board of Higher Education may consider relevant all minimum requirements established by statute or by regulation with respect to the State colleges and universities of the Commonwealth and may consider relevant such minimum requirements established by statute or by regulation with respect to secondary and special education programs in the school district or districts of the area to be served by the community college.(c) In approving or disapproving such plans, the State Board of Higher Education shall consider the needs of areas adjacent to the areas to be served by the community college and of the State with respect to higher education and long range plans therefor established by the State Board of Higher Education. Other school districts and municipalities may petition the State Board of Higher Education to become a part of a local sponsor as hereafter in this act provided.(d) No plan for the establishment of a community college shall be approved unless the State Board of Higher Education 20260HB2656PN3667 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determines that the local sponsor has a population of a sufficient number to assure a sustained minimum enrollment, has sufficient wealth to financially support such college and is not adequately served by established institutions of higher learning. No plan for the establishment of a community college shall be approved unless it contains an estimate of operating cost for administration, instruction, operation and maintenance and such other accounts as the State Board of Higher Education may, from time to time, determine. No plan for the establishment of a community college shall be approved unless it contains an estimate of any proposed capital improvements for the next following ten years.(e) To confer with and obtain the approval of the Governor's Office as to the number of community colleges which can be approved for participation during the ensuing fiscal period.[(f) Wherever in this act the approval of the State Board of Education is required in any matter, the State Board of Education may require the Department of Education to make and report its findings and recommendations on such matter to the Council of Higher Education for the formulation of policies, standards, rules and regulations for consideration by the State Board of Education.]Section 1903-A. Plans and Procedures for Establishing.--(a) A proposed community college plan shall be submitted by the local sponsor in such form and containing such information as the State Board of Higher Education may require. The plan shall designate the name of the proposed community college which shall be the "Community College of ............................." or "................................... Technical Institute," stating the name of the local sponsor or area of such community 20260HB2656PN3667 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 college. If there are two or more members of the local sponsor, the plan shall include provisions allocating financial responsibility for the community college among the members of the local sponsor subject to the policies, standards, rules and regulations of the State Board of Higher Education.(b) The community college plan, when submitted by the local sponsor, shall first be approved by the governing body of each member of the local sponsor and shall be submitted by them jointly in all counties. School directors from school districts of the second, third and fourth class located in two or more counties may meet in convention and approve a community college plan for submission to the State Board of Higher Education.(c) Upon the approval of the plan by the State Board of Higher Education, the governing bodies of the local sponsor shall appoint a board of trustees of the community college, as hereinafter provided, and, upon such appointment, the community college shall be considered established.(d) A county board of school directors shall prepare a plan for establishing a community college when required by a convention of school directors from school districts within the county. Such plan shall indicate the school districts to be served by a community college. Thereafter, a convention of school directors from school districts within the proposed area of a community college shall be called to consider:(1) The proposed plan.(2) The question of authorizing the county board or county boards to sponsor a community college.(3) The allocation of the cost of establishing and operating a community college.(e) Following [such] consideration of the matters under 20260HB2656PN3667 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (d), the school directors in convention may approve a plan to establish and operate a community college subject to the approval of the State Board of Higher Education and to determine the share and formula for sharing operating expenses, capital outlay, debt service or lease payment to be borne by the school districts. School directors from the districts not desiring to participate in the establishment of a community college shall not be eligible to vote on any question placed before the convention.(f) Member districts shall share the cost of establishing and operating a community college.Section 1904-A. Election or Appointment; Term and Organization of Board of Trustees.--(a) The board of trustees of a community college shall be elected by the vote of a majority of the members of the governing body or governing bodies of the local sponsor within sixty (60) days of the approval of the plan by the State Board of Higher Education, except that the board of trustees of a community college sponsored by a city of the second class shall be appointed by the mayor, with approval of city council, and in cities of the first class shall be appointed by the mayor from nomination from a nominating panel established in accordance with municipal ordinance.* * *Section 1905-A. Powers and Duties of Board of Trustees.--(a) The affairs of any community college established under this act shall be administered and supervised by a board of trustees. Subject to any law and to any policies, standards, rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Higher Education provided for community colleges, the board of trustees shall, 20260HB2656PN3667 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining a community college, have the power, and its duty shall be:* * *(6) To submit to the State Board of Higher Education for its approval proposed amendments to the community college plan.* * *Section 1907-A. Students.--Any resident of the Commonwealth may apply for admission to any community college established under this act. The State Board of Higher Education may provide for the admission to community colleges of persons who are not residents of the Commonwealth, but no college shall admit such persons unless the admission is in accordance with the policies, standards, rules and regulations of the State Board of Higher Education. The State Board of Higher Education may prescribe standards for determining the place of residence of students and applicants for admission to community colleges.Section 1908-A. Tuition.--(a) The normal tuition charged by each community college shall be an amount fixed by the board of trustees of the community college, in accordance with policies, standards, rules and regulations of the State Board of Higher Education, determined by apportioning among the students enrolled in such college not more than one-third of its annual operating costs.* * *(c) A student who is a resident of the Commonwealth in an area which is not a local sponsor of a community college and who is enrolled in a community college in accordance with the policies, standards, rules and regulations of the State Board of Higher Education shall pay a tuition charge fixed by the board of trustees of the college attended. Such tuition shall total 20260HB2656PN3667 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the amount representing the difference between total operating cost per equivalent full-time student and the amount payable by the State on behalf of each equivalent full-time student enrolled. The community college enrolling such student shall be entitled to State reimbursement as hereinafter provided.* * *(e) A student who is not a resident of the Commonwealth and who is enrolled in a community college in accordance with the policies, standards, rules and regulations of the State Board of Higher Education shall pay such tuition charge as is approved by the Department of Education.Section 1910-A. Withdrawal of Sponsorship; Dissolution of Community College.--No school district or municipality which is a local sponsor or a part of a local sponsor may withdraw its sponsorship from a community college nor may any community college be disestablished without the approval of the State Board of Higher Education.Section 1911-A. Participation in or Admission to Established Community College.--(a) The governing body of any school district or of any municipality desiring to have such school district or municipality participate in an established community college shall present a petition to the State Board of Higher Education in such form as the board may prescribe requesting approval to participate in or to be admitted to the community college.(b) Upon the approval of the State Board of Higher Education of a petition submitted by a governing body, such petitioning school district or municipality shall be considered a local sponsor of the community college and be admitted thereto.Section 1912-A. Degrees.--The State Board of Higher 20260HB2656PN3667 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Education shall prescribe the types of diplomas, certificates or degrees that may be granted students who complete post-secondary education courses in community colleges.Section 1913-A. Financial Program; Reimbursement of Payments.--* * *(b) * * *(1.4) The equivalent full-time student reimbursement of a community college shall be the sum of credit course, noncredit course and stipend reimbursements. These reimbursements shall be calculated using a reimbursement factor of one thousand and forty dollars ($1,040) for the 1993-1994 fiscal year, of one thousand eighty dollars ($1,080) for the 1994-1995 fiscal year and of one thousand one hundred eighty dollars ($1,180) for the 1995-1996 fiscal year and one thousand and two hundred and ten dollars ($1,210) for the 1996-1997 fiscal year and one thousand two hundred sixty dollars ($1,260) for the 1997-1998 fiscal year and the 1998-1999 fiscal year and one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300) for the 1999-2000 fiscal year and one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) for the 2000-2001 fiscal year and one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for the 2001-2002 fiscal year and for each year thereafter and shall be determined as follows:(i) Credit course reimbursement shall be calculated by multiplying the reimbursement factor by the number of equivalent full-time students enrolled in credit courses as determined by an audit to be made in a manner prescribed by the State Board of Higher Education.* * *(d) The State Board of Higher Education shall adopt policies, standards, rules and regulations for determining 20260HB2656PN3667 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimbursable capital expenses and operating costs, and the Department of Education shall approve such expenses and costs for the purpose of reimbursement by the Commonwealth.(e) The State Board of Higher Education shall apply for, receive and administer, subject to any applicable regulations or laws of the Federal Government or any agency thereof, any Federal grants, appropriations, allocations and programs to fulfill the purpose of this act.* * *(k.1) * * *(6) The State Board of Higher Education shall promulgate final-omitted regulations pursuant to the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the "Regulatory Review Act," as necessary to implement this subsection.* * *Section 2. Section 2013-L(a)(3) of the act, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.818, No.69), is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2013-L. Long-term strategic planning.(a) Development of strategic plan.--The board shall be responsible for developing a higher education strategic plan for the Commonwealth which shall:* * *[(3) Include components required of the master plan for higher education under section 2603-B(h).]* * *(f) Institutional long-range plans.--The board may require the submission of long-range plans from all institutions of higher education at the times and in the form requested by the board. The documents may be reviewed by the board in the 20260HB2656PN3667 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development and advancement of the strategic plan under this section.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2014-L. Additional powers and duties.(a) Generally.--The board shall have the following additional powers and duties:(1) The board shall issue policies, standards, rules and regulations, adopt broad policies and principles and establish standards governing higher education in this Commonwealth.(2) The board may adopt policies under which the Secretary of Education shall:(i) Approve or disapprove any action of a State-owned university, community college or State-related or State-aided college or university in establishing additional branches or campuses or discontinuing branches or campuses.(ii) Approve or disapprove action of a State-owned university, community college or State-related or State-aided college or university in establishing a new professional school or upper division program by a two-year institution.(iii) Approve or disapprove an application by a two-year institution to become a four-year institution.(iv) Approve or disapprove the request of a private institution of higher education for admission to State-related or State-aided status or for eligibility for other State financial support.(3) The board shall develop standards for the approval of colleges and universities for the granting of certificates 20260HB2656PN3667 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and degrees. This paragraph includes the authority to prescribe standards and qualifications under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries) subject to the limitation in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6503(e.1) (relating to certification of institutions).(4) The board shall develop standards for all higher education building projects involving the use of State money or the money of any Commonwealth instrumentality.(5) The board shall investigate programs, conduct research studies and formulate policy proposals in all areas pertaining to higher education in this Commonwealth.(b) Provisions relating to State-owned universities.--With regard to State-owned institutions, the Secretary of Education may not approve or disapprove action under subsection (a)(2)(i) or (ii) until after recommendation by the Board of Governors of the State System of Higher Education, whenever the recommendation is deemed necessary or required by law.(c) Approval required.-- (1) An institution of higher education may not proceed with action described in subsection (a)(2)(i) or (ii) unless the action has been approved by the Secretary of Education.(2) With regard to approval by the Secretary of Education under subsections (a) and (b), no action to be financed wholly or in part from State appropriations shall be taken by an institution of higher education:(i) Prior to the next fiscal year or until the General Assembly approves the Governor's budget for the next fiscal year.(ii) Prior to the Governor and the Secretary of the Budget being provided with written notification of the 20260HB2656PN3667 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approval, including projected five-year fiscal analysis and an explanation as to the necessity for the proposed action in relation to the strategic plan for higher education.(d) Transfer.--Except as needed under subsection (e), all files, records, contracts, agreements and other materials used by the State Board of Education or the Council of Higher Education in connection with the powers, duties or functions exercised by the State Board of Education or the Council of Higher Education related to the powers and duties in this section are transferred to the board.(e) Regulations.-- (1) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education under authority transferred to this board shall:(i) Continue to be enforced by the State Board of Education in collaboration with the board until the board modifies or revises the regulation.(ii) Continue to have the same force and effect until modified or revised by the board under this section.(2) The board may promulgate regulations as needed to implement this section.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to vest the board with any power or duty vested in the State Board of Education related to educator preparation, educator certification, technical institutes or postsecondary career and technical education.Section 4. Sections 2602-B(e), 2603-B(a), (d)(4)(i), (5), (6), (7), (8) and (9), (e), (f), (g) and (h), 2604-B(c) and 2605-B(a) of the act are amended to read:20260HB2656PN3667 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2602-B. Membership.--* * *(e) For the purpose of formulating policy proposals [applicable to elementary, secondary, career and technical education and higher education in this Commonwealth], there shall be two councils, which shall consist of ten (10) members of the board each, the chairman being a member of both councils, and shall be known as the Council of Basic Education and the Council of Higher Education. The Governor shall designate to serve at his pleasure a member serving on each council to act as chairman of the council. Each council shall meet at the call of its chairman or at the request of a majority of the members of the council. The chairman of the board may appoint special joint committees from among the members of the board to formulate policy proposals in those areas which fall within the purview of both of the councils.* * *Section 2603-B. Powers and Duties of the Board.--(a) The board shall have the power, and its duty shall be, to review the statements of policy, standards, rules and regulations formulated by the Council of Basic Education and the Council of Higher Education, and adopt broad policies and principles, and establish standards governing the educational program of the Commonwealth. This subsection shall not apply to a statement of policy, standard, rule, regulation or principle relating exclusively to higher education.* * *(d) The board shall also have the authority and duty to:* * *(4) (i) apply for, receive and administer, subject to any applicable regulations or laws of the Federal Government or any 20260HB2656PN3667 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency thereof, any Federal grants, appropriations, allocations and programs for the development of academic facilities on behalf of the Commonwealth[,] or any of its school districts [or any institution of higher education, public or private,] within this Commonwealth;* * *[(5) adopt policies under which the Secretary of Education shall approve or disapprove any action of a State-owned university, community college or State-related or State-aided college or university in establishing additional branches or campuses, or in discontinuing branches or campuses;(6) adopt policies under which the Secretary of Education shall approve or disapprove any action of a State-owned university, community college or State-related or State-aided college or university in establishing new professional schools or upper division programs by two (2) year institutions;(7) adopt policies under which the Secretary of Education shall approve or disapprove applications by two (2) year institutions to become four (4) year institutions;(8) adopt policies under which the Secretary of Education shall approve or disapprove the request of any private institution of higher education for admission to State-related or State-aided status, or for eligibility for other State financial support;(9) require the submission of long-range plans from all public and private institutions of higher education at the times and in the form requested by the board. Such documents shall be reviewed by the Council of Higher Education and the board in the development of a master plan for higher education as provided in subsection (h) and section 2604-B(c)(1);]20260HB2656PN3667 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *[(e) With regard to State-owned institutions, approval or disapproval by the Secretary of Education under the provisions of clauses (5) and (6) of subsection (d) shall not be made until after recommendation by the Board of Governors of the State System of Higher Education, whenever such recommendation is deemed necessary or required by law.(f) No institution of higher education may proceed with any action unless it has been approved by the Secretary of Education under the provisions of clauses (5) through (8) of subsection (d).(g) With regard to approval by the Secretary of Education under the provisions of clauses (5) through (8) of subsection (d), no action to be financed wholly or in part from State appropriations shall be taken by an institution of higher learning (i) prior to the next fiscal year or until the General Assembly approves the Governor's budget for the next fiscal year, and (ii) prior to the Governor and the Secretary of the Budget being provided with written notification of such approval, including projected five (5) year fiscal analysis and an explanation as to the necessity for the proposed action in relation to the master plan for higher education.(h) Every ten (10) years, the board shall adopt a master plan for higher education which shall be for the guidance of the Governor, the General Assembly, and all institutions of higher education financed wholly or in part from State appropriations. The master plan shall:(1) define the role of each type of institution (State-owned universities, State-related universities, community colleges, private colleges and universities and off-campus centers of any 20260HB2656PN3667 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of these and other institutions authorized to grant degrees) in this Commonwealth;(2) recommend enrollment levels for each such institution;(3) recommend methods for governance;(4) recommend methods for the distribution of State funds among the institutions;(5) evaluate the status of physical plants and technical equipment and project needs;(6) evaluate the status of and projection of manpower needs;(7) evaluate enrollment accessibility to institutions of higher learning by the public; and(8) otherwise provide for an orderly development of institutions of higher education in this Commonwealth.]* * *Section 2604-B. Powers and Duties of Council of Basic Education and Council of Higher Education.--* * *(c) The Council of Higher Education shall have the power and its duty shall be to:[(1) develop a master plan for higher education in this Commonwealth, including a system of community colleges as provided by law, for adoption by the board;(2) develop standards for the approval of colleges and universities for the granting of certificates and degrees;(3) develop standards for all higher education building projects involving the use of State funds or the funds of any Commonwealth instrumentality; and](4) investigate programs, conduct research studies and formulate policy proposals in all areas pertaining to [higher education in this Commonwealth, including a system of community colleges and technical institutes as provided by law.] educator 20260HB2656PN3667 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 preparation and educator certification, technical institutes and public post-secondary career and technical education.Section 2605-B. Reports and Recommendations.--(a) Annually in January, the board shall submit a comprehensive report of its activities to the Governor and the General Assembly together with its recommendations for improvements in education in this Commonwealth. The board's report shall include a statement outlining the expected benefits and projected costs of any recommended course of action. The report shall also include information regarding the ongoing review of [the Master Plan for Higher Education and] the Master Plan for Basic Education and list any projected changes.* * *Section 5. The addition of section 2014-L of the act is a continuation of powers and duties previously vested in the State Board of Education in sections 2603-B and 2604-B of the act. Except as otherwise provided in section 2014-L, all activities initiated by the State Board of Education under the powers and duties transferred under sections 2603-B and 2604-B of the act to the State Board of Higher Education shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under section 2014-L of the act. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under the powers and duties transferred under sections 2603-B and 2604-B of the act to the State Board of Higher Education and which are in effect on the effective date of this section shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under section 2014-L of the act.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2656PN3667 - 18 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728